Vermont, session 2025-2026, H52.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 578 is amended to read:
§ 578. GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION REQUIREMENTS GOALS
(a) Greenhouse gas reduction requirements goals. It is the goal of Vermont
shall to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases from within the geographical
boundaries of the State and those emissions outside the boundaries of the State
that are caused by the use of energy in Vermont, as measured and inventoried
pursuant to section 582 of this title, by:
* * *
VT LEG #380498 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.52
2025 Page 2 of 9
(c) Implementation of State programs to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.
In order to facilitate the State’s compliance with the goals established in this
section, all State agencies shall consider, whenever practicable, any increase or
decrease in greenhouse gas emissions in their decision-making procedures with
respect to the purchase and use of equipment and goods; the siting,
construction, and maintenance of buildings; the assignment of personnel; and
the planning, design, and operation of programs, services, and infrastructure.
* * *
Sec. 2. 30 V.S.A. § 202a is amended to read:
§ 202a. STATE ENERGY POLICY
It is the general policy of the State of Vermont:
* * *
(3) To meet Vermont’s energy service needs in a manner that will
achieve the greenhouse gas emissions reductions requirements goals pursuant
to 10 V.S.A § 578 and is consistent with the Vermont Climate Action Plan
adopted and updated pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 592.
Sec. 3. 30 V.S.A. § 202b is amended to read:
§ 202b. STATE COMPREHENSIVE ENERGY PLAN
(a) The Department of Public Service, in conjunction with other State
agencies designated by the Governor, shall prepare a State Comprehensive
Energy Plan covering at least a 20-year period. The Plan shall seek to
VT LEG #380498 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.52
2025 Page 3 of 9
implement the State energy policy set forth in section 202a of this title,
including meeting the State’s greenhouse gas emissions reductions
requirements goals pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 578, and shall be consistent with
the relevant goals of 24 V.S.A. § 4302 and with the Vermont Climate Action
Plan adopted and updated pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 592. The State
Comprehensive Energy Plan shall include:
* * *
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 591 is amended to read:
§ 591. VERMONT CLIMATE COUNCIL
* * *
(b) The Council shall:
(1) Identify, analyze, and evaluate strategies and programs to reduce
greenhouse gas emissions; achieve the State’s reduction requirements goals
pursuant to section 578 of this title; and build resilience to prepare the State’s
communities, infrastructure, and economy to adapt to the current and
anticipated effects of climate change, including:
* * *
(2) On or before December 1, 2021, adopt the Vermont Climate Action
Plan (Plan) and update the Plan on or before July 1 every four years thereafter.
The Plan shall set forth recommend the specific initiatives, programs, and
strategies that the State shall pursue consider implementing to reduce
VT LEG #380498 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.52
2025 Page 4 of 9
greenhouse gas emissions; achieve the State’s reduction requirements goals
pursuant to section 578 of this title; and build resilience to prepare the State’s
communities, infrastructure, and economy to adapt to the current and
anticipated effects of climate change.
(3) Identify the means to accurately measure:
(A) the State’s greenhouse gas emissions and progress towards
meeting the reduction requirements goals pursuant to section 578 of this title,
including publishing emissions data in a timely manner;
* * *
(4) Provide guidance to the Secretary of Natural Resources concerning
the form, content, and subject matter of rules to be adopted recommended for
adoption pursuant to section 593 of this chapter.
* * *
(i) On or before January 15, 2021 and every January 15 thereafter, the
Council shall submit a written report to the General Assembly concerning the
Council’s activities and the State’s progress towards meeting the greenhouse
gas reduction requirements goals pursuant to section 578 of this title. On or
before November 1, 2021 and every second November 1 thereafter, the
Director of Vermont Emergency Management shall file a report with the
Council concerning Vermont’s overall municipal resilience to increased
hazards presented by climate change that shall include hazard mitigation plans,
VT LEG #380498 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.52
2025 Page 5 of 9
local emergency management plans, and survey results as deemed appropriate
by the Director. Subsequent reports shall include updates to document
progress in local resilience. The report shall inform Council recommendations
on policies to address gaps in local resilience.
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 592 is amended to read:
§ 592. THE VERMONT CLIMATE ACTION PLAN
(a) On or before December 1, 2021, the Vermont Climate Council
(Council) shall adopt adopted the Vermont Climate Action Plan (Plan) and.
The Council shall update the Plan on or before July 1 every four years
thereafter.
(b) The Plan shall set forth recommend the specific initiatives, programs,
and strategies, including regulatory and legislative changes, necessary to
achieve the State’s greenhouse gas emissions reduction requirements goals
pursuant to section 578 of this title and build resilience to prepare the State’s
communities, infrastructure, and economy to adapt to the current and
anticipated effects of climate change. The Plan shall include specific
initiatives, programs, and strategies that will:
* * *
(e) The updated Plan shall form the basis for the rules adopted recommend
rules for consideration by the Secretary of Natural Resources pursuant to
section 593 of this chapter. If the Council fails to adopt the Plan or update the
VT LEG #380498 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.52
2025 Page 6 of 9
Plan as required by this chapter, the Secretary shall proceed with consider
adopting and implementing rules that in the Secretary’s discretion are cost
effective, practicable, and designed pursuant to subsection 593(j) of this
chapter to achieve the greenhouse gas emissions reductions requirements goals
pursuant to section 578 of this title.
Sec. 6. 10 V.S.A. § 593 is amended to read:
§ 593. RULES
(a) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall consider and adopt rules
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, which are in the Secretary’s discretion cost
effective, practicable, designed to achieve the greenhouse gas emissions
reductions requirements pursuant to section 578 of this title, and are consistent
with the Vermont Climate Action Plan (Plan). In adopting rules pursuant to
this section, the Secretary shall:
(1) Ensure that Consider whether the rules are consistent with the
specific initiatives, programs, and strategies set forth in the Plan and updates to
the Plan; follow consider the Vermont Climate Council’s guidance provided
pursuant to subdivision 591(b)(4) of this chapter; and further the objectives
pursuant to subsection 592(d) of this chapter.
(2) Develop a detailed record containing facts; data; and legal, scientific,
and technical information sufficient to establish a reasonable basis to believe
that the rules shall achieve the State’s greenhouse gas emissions reductions
VT LEG #380498 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.52
2025 Page 7 of 9
requirements goals pursuant to section 578 of this title. This detailed record
shall be included with the rule and filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to
3 V.S.A. § 838.
(b) On or before December 1, 2022, the Secretary shall adopt and
implement rules consistent with the specific initiatives, programs, and
strategies set forth in the Plan and achieve the 2025 greenhouse gas emissions
reduction requirement goal pursuant to section 578 of this title.
* * *
(d) The Secretary shall, on or before July 1, 2024, review and, if necessary,
update the rules required by subsection (b) of this section in order to ensure
that the 2025 greenhouse gas emissions reduction requirement goal pursuant to
section 578 of this title is achieved. In performing this review and update, the
Secretary shall observe the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.
(e) On or before July 1, 2026, the Secretary shall adopt and implement
rules consistent with the specific initiatives, programs, and strategies set forth
in the Plan and updates to the Plan and achieve the 2030 greenhouse gas
emissions reduction requirement goal pursuant to section 578 of this title. The
Secretary shall observe the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.
(f) The Secretary shall, at his or her the Secretary’s discretion, but not less
frequently than once every two years between 2026 and 2030, review and, if
necessary, update the rules required by subsection (e) of this section in order to
VT LEG #380498 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.52
2025 Page 8 of 9
ensure that the 2030 greenhouse gas emissions reduction requirement goal
pursuant to section 578 of this title is achieved. In performing this review and
update, the Secretary shall observe the requirements of subsection (c) of this
section.
(g) On or before July 1, 2040, the Secretary shall adopt and implement
rules consistent with the specific initiatives, programs, and strategies set forth
in the Plan and updates to the Plan and achieve the 2050 greenhouse gas
emissions reduction requirement goal pursuant to section 578 of this title.
(h) The Secretary shall, at his or her the Secretary’s discretion, but not less
frequently than once every two years between 2040 and 2050, review and, if
necessary, update the rules required by subsection (g) of this section in order to
ensure that the 2050 greenhouse gas emissions reduction requirement goal
pursuant to section 578 of this title is achieved. In performing this review and
update, the Secretary shall observe the requirements of subsection (c) of this
section.
* * *
(j) If the Council fails to adopt the Plan or update the Plan as required by
section 592 of this chapter, the Secretary shall adopt and implement rules
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to achieve the greenhouse gas emissions
reductions requirements goals pursuant to section 578 of this title.
* * *
VT LEG #380498 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.52
2025 Page 9 of 9
Sec. 7. REPEAL
10 V.S.A. § 594 (cause of action) is repealed.
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380498 v.4